Utah statutes.
13-9-2.   Authority of state, county or municipality or public or private corporation to apply to establish foreign-trade zone.

The state of Utah or any county or municipality within the state of Utah, or a public or private corporation, or any combination thereof, may apply to the Foreign-Trade Zones Board, United States Department of Commerce, for the right to establish, operate, and maintain a foreign-trade zone as defined in the Foreign-Trade Zones Act.

